test/src/morphology/V-nammadit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - nammadit: # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     nammadit+V+Inf: nammadit
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nammadav
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nammada
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [nammat, nammada]
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: nammadin
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: [nammadähppen, nammadiehpen]
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: nammadebá
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nammadip
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nammadihpit
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nammadi

     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nammadiv
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nammadi
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nammadij
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: nammadijmen
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: nammadijden
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: nammadijga
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nammadijme
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nammadijde
     nammadit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nammadin

     nammadit+V+Pot+Sg1: nammadittjav
     nammadit+V+Pot+Sg2: nammadittja
     nammadit+V+Pot+Sg3: nammaditj
     nammadit+V+Pot+Du1: nammadittjin
     nammadit+V+Pot+Du2: [nammadittjabiehten, nammadittjabähtten]
     nammadit+V+Pot+Du3: nammadittjaba
     nammadit+V+Pot+Pl1: nammadittjap
     nammadit+V+Pot+Pl2: nammadittjabihtit
     nammadit+V+Pot+Pl3: nammadittji

     nammadit+V+GerI: nammadittijn 
     nammadit+V+Sup: nammaditjit
     nammadit+V+Vabe: nammadak  
     nammadit+V+Vgen: nammada 
     nammadit+V+GerII: nammadame
     nammadit+V+PrfPrc: nammadam
     nammadit+V+PrsPrc: nammadäddje 
     nammadit+V+Imp+Sg2: nammada  
     nammadit+V+Imp+Du2: nammadihtin
     nammadit+V+Imp+Pl2: nammadihtit
     nammadit+V+Vsubst: nammadim
     
